New York, session 2025-2026, S10342.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 356 of the public authorities law, 2 as amended by section 6 of part M of chapter 61 of the laws of 2017, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. The Hudson section. Beginning at the northerly end of the southern 5 Westchester connection at or near Tuckahoe road, thence in a general 6 northerly and westerly direction crossing the Hudson river at a point 7 south of Highland Falls, which crossing shall be known as "The [Governor 8 Mario M. Cuomo] Lieutenant Michael P. Murphy Tappan Zee Bridge", includ- 9 ing a highway connection between "The [Governor Mario M. Cuomo] Lieuten- 10 ant Michael P. Murphy Tappan Zee Bridge" and the New England section of 11 the thruway presently known as interstate route two hundred eighty-sev- 12 en, thence in a general westerly direction to intersect with existing 13 route number seventeen or to a connection with that route, including a 14 thruway connection from that portion of the section west of the Hudson 15 river, generally southerly to a point to be determined by the authority 16 on the New York-New Jersey boundary line. 17 § 2. Section 13-0103 of the environmental conservation law, as amended 18 by section 7 of part M of chapter 61 of the laws of 2017, is amended to 19 read as follows: 20 § 13-0103. Marine and coastal district described. 21 The marine and coastal district shall include the waters of the Atlan- 22 tic Ocean within three nautical miles from the coast line and all other 23 tidal waters within the state, including the Hudson River up to the 24 [Governor Mario M. Cuomo] Lieutenant Michael P. Murphy Tappan Zee 25 bridge. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15510-01-6 S. 10342 2 1 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 13-0307 of the environmental conserva- 2 tion law, as amended by section 8 of part M of chapter 61 of the laws of 3 2017, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. The department periodically shall examine all shellfish lands with- 5 in the marine district and the Hudson River between the [Governor Mario 6 M. Cuomo] Lieutenant Michael P. Murphy Tappan Zee bridge and the feder- 7 al dam at Troy to ascertain the sanitary condition thereof in accordance 8 with regulations promulgated pursuant to section 13-0319 of this title. 9 § 4. Section 342-ww of the highway law, as amended by section 9 of 10 part M of chapter 61 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as follows: 11 § 342-ww. Portion of the New York state thruway to be designated as 12 the "Jewish War Veterans Memorial Highway". All that portion of the New 13 York state thruway in the county of Rockland constituting interstate 14 route 287 from the New Jersey border to "The [Governor Mario M. Cuomo] 15 Lieutenant Michael P. Murphy Tappan Zee Bridge" shall be designated and 16 known as the "Jewish War Veterans Memorial Highway". 17 § 5. Subdivision 2 of section 349-a of the highway law, as amended by 18 section 10 of part M of chapter 61 of the laws of 2017, is amended to 19 read as follows: 20 2. The Hudson section. Beginning at the northerly end of the southern 21 Westchester connection at or near Tuckahoe road, thence in a general 22 northerly and westerly direction crossing the Hudson river at a point 23 south of Highland Falls, which crossing shall be known as "The [Governor 24 Mario M. Cuomo] Lieutenant Michael P. Murphy Tappan Zee Bridge", thence 25 in a general westerly direction to intersect with existing route number 26 seventeen or to a connection with that route, including a thruway 27 connection from that portion of the section west of the Hudson river, 28 generally southerly to a point to be determined by the authority on the 29 New York-New Jersey boundary line. 30 § 6. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 31 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 32 as designated pursuant to this act. 33 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately.